New York, session 2025-2026, S9078.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 31 to read as follows: 3 31. Persons serving as the district attorney of Dutchess county, while 4 acting within the scope of such person's official duties and jurisdic- 5 tion; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision shall be 6 deemed to authorize such person to carry, possess, repair or dispose of 7 a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor has been issued pursu- 8 ant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14432-01-6